test/resources/ex1.lexc
! Comments begin with !

! Multichar_Symbols (separated by whitespace, terminated by first declared LEXICON)
Multichar_Symbols +A +N +V  ! +A is adjectives, +N is nouns, +V is verbs
+Adv  ! This one is for adverbs
+Punc ! punctuation
! +Cmpar ! This is broken for now, so I commented it out.

! The bulk of lexc is made of up LEXICONs, which contain entries that point to
! other LEXICONs. "Root" is a reserved lexicon name, and the start state.
! "#" is also a reserved lexicon name, and the end state.

LEXICON Root  ! Root is a reserved lexicon name, if it is not declared, then the first LEXICON is assumed to be the root
big Adj ;  ! This 
bigly Adv ;  ! Not sure if this is a real word...
dog Noun ;
cat Noun ;
crow Noun ;
crow Verb ;
Num ;        ! This continuation class generates numbers using xfst-style regex

! NB all the following are reserved characters

sour% cream Noun ;  ! escaped space
%: Punctuation ;    ! escaped :
%; Punctuation ;    ! escaped ;
%# Punctuation ;    ! escaped #
%! Punctuation ;    ! escaped !
%% Punctuation ;    ! escaped %
%< Punctuation ;    ! escaped <
%> Punctuation ;    ! escaped >

%:%:%::%: # ; ! Should map ::: to :

LEXICON Adj
+A: # ;      ! # is a reserved lexicon name which means end-of-word (final state).
! +Cmpar:er # ;  ! Broken, so I commented it out.

LEXICON Adv
+Adv: # ;

LEXICON Noun
+N+Sg: # ;
+N+Pl:s # ;

LEXICON Num_start
<[0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]> Num ; ! This is an xfst regular expression

LEXICON Num
<[0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]> Num ; ! This is an xfst regular expression and a cyclic continuation
# ;

LEXICON Verb
+V+Inf: # ;
+V+Pres:s # ;

LEXICON Punctuation
+Punc: # ;

END

This text is ignored because it is after END
